Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-397
Assault of an unborn child in the first degree; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of assault of an unborn child in the first degree if he or she, during the commission of any criminal assault on a pregnant woman, intentionally or knowingly causes serious bodily injury to her unborn child.

(2) Assault of an unborn child in the first degree is a Class IIA felony.

Laws 2006, LB 57, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 25.